Wyoming, session 2025, HB0195.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 40-12-115 is created to read:

40-12-115. Credit reports; medical debt reporting
prohibited; definitions.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0195

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0583
(i) "Collection entity" means any person that
purchases medical debt from or collects medical debt on
behalf of another person;

(ii) "Credit report" means as defined in W.S.
40-12-501(a)(iv);

(iii) "Credit reporting agency" means a person
that collects and sells information about a person's credit
history;

(iv) "Health care product" means a product
including, but not limited to, a good, device, durable
medical equipment or prescription drug provided in the
provision of health care services;

(v) "Health care services" means as defined in
W.S. 26-13-303(a)(ii);

(vi) "Medical debt" means an obligation or
alleged obligation of a consumer to pay any amount related
to the receipt by the consumer of health care products or
health care services. "Medical debt" shall not include debt
HB0195

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0583
charged to a credit card unless the credit card is issued
under an open-end or closed-end credit plan offered
specifically for the payment of charges related to health
care products or health care services;

(vii) "Medical facility" means a hospital,
clinic, office, nursing home or other facility where a
health care provider provides health care products or
services to patients.

(b) On and after July 1, 2025, each medical facility
and each collection entity doing business in this state
shall not report any portion of a medical debt to a credit
reporting agency for use in a credit report.

(c) If a medical facility or collection entity
violates this section, a court of competent jurisdiction
may impose a civil penalty on the medical facility or
collection entity in the amount of the medical debt
reported.

Section 2. W.S. 40-12-102(a)(x) is amended to read:

HB0195

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0583
40-12-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(x) "This act" means W.S. 40-12-101 through
40-12-114 40-12-115.

Section 3. Nothing in this act is to be construed to
impair any contract entered into before July 1, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0195